Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Judicial Appraisal of Shares

48-23-301. Court action.

If a demand for payment under § 48-23-209 remains unsettled, the corporation shall commence a proceeding within two (2) months after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the shares and accrued interest. If the corporation does not commence the proceeding within the two-month period, it shall pay each dissenter whose demand remains unsettled the amount demanded.

The corporation shall commence the proceeding in a court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located. If the corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in this state, it shall commence the proceeding in the county in this state where the registered office of the domestic corporation merged with or whose shares were acquired by the foreign corporation was located.

The corporation shall make all dissenters (whether or not residents of this state) whose demands remain unsettled, parties to the proceeding as in an action against their shares and all parties must be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection (b) is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one (1) or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The dissenters are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.

Each dissenter made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment:

For the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the dissenter's shares, plus accrued interest, exceeds the amount paid by the corporation; or

For the fair value, plus accrued interest, of the dissenter's after-acquired shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under § 48-23-208.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.30.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-302.

Law Reviews.

Valuation of Dissenters' Stock Under the Appraisal Remedy — Is the Delaware Block Method Right for Tennessee? (Don S. Clardy), 62 Tenn. L. Rev. 285 (1995).

48-23-302. Court costs and counsel fees.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under § 48-23-301 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment under § 48-23-209.

The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable against:

The corporation and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of part 2 of this chapter; or

Either the corporation or a dissenter, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this chapter.

If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated, and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may award to these counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded to the dissenters who were benefited.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.31.